Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.110

Records—Contents—Examination.

All certified feed lots shall furnish the director with records as requested by the director on a monthly basis on all cattle entering or on feed in the certified feed lots and dispersed therefrom. These records must include a copy of each inspection certificate received and an itemized listing of all cattle entering and leaving the feed lot. All requested records shall be subject to examination by the director for the purpose of maintaining the integrity of the identity of all the cattle. The director may make the examinations only during regular business hours or any working shift except in an emergency to protect the interest of the owners of the cattle.

[ 2003 c 326 s 55; 1991 c 109 s 12; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.